Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 22.1-289.02.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Child day center”
means a child day program offered to (i) two or more children under the age of 13 in a facility that is not the residence of the provider or of any of the children in care or (ii) 13 or more children at any location.

“Child day program”
means a regularly operating service arrangement for children where, during the absence of a parent or guardian, a person or organization has agreed to assume responsibility for the supervision, protection, and well-being of a child under the age of 13 for less than a 24-hour period.

“Early childhood care and education entity”
means a child day center, family day home, or family day system serving children under the age of five.

“Family day home”
means a child day program offered in the residence of the provider or the home of any of the children in care for one through 12 children under the age of 13, exclusive of the provider’s own children and any children who reside in the home, when at least one child receives care for compensation. The provider of a licensed or registered family day home shall disclose to the parents or guardians of children in their care the percentage of time per week that persons other than the provider will care for the children. Family day homes serving five through 12 children, exclusive of the provider’s own children and any children who reside in the home, shall be licensed. However, no family day home shall care for more than four children under the age of two, including the provider’s own children and any children who reside in the home, unless the family day home is licensed or voluntarily registered. However, a family day home where the children in care are all related to the provider by blood or marriage shall not be required to be licensed.

“Family day system”
means any person who approves family day homes as members of its system; who refers children to available family day homes in that system; and who, through contractual arrangement, may provide central administrative functions including, but not limited to, training of operators of member homes; technical assistance and consultation to operators of member homes; inspection, supervision, monitoring, and evaluation of member homes; and referral of children to available health and social services.

“Head Start provider”
means a public or private, nonprofit or for-profit organization or agency, including any community-based organization, as such term is defined in 20 U.S.C. § 7801, to which a grantee has delegated all or part of the responsibility of the grantee for operating a Head Start program.

“Publicly funded provider”
means any (i) educational program provided by a school division or local government to children between birth and age five or (ii) child day program that receives state or federal funds in support of its operations that serves three or more unrelated children. “Publicly funded provider” does not include any program for which the sole source of public funding is the federal Child and Adult Care Food Program (CACFP) administered by the U.S. Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service.

“Registered family day home”
means any family day home that has met the standards for voluntary registration for such homes pursuant to regulations adopted by the Board and that has obtained a certificate of registration from the Superintendent.

History.

2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 171, cl. 2, effective March 18, 2021, provides: “§ 1. That, because the COVID-19 pandemic has created the need to temporarily expand the Child Care Subsidy Program (the Program) authorized pursuant to 22VAC40-665 to serve more families, including those families of individuals searching for employment during the period of economic recovery, such program shall be amended to provide that:

“1. A family shall be eligible for assistance through the Program if (i) the family’s income does not exceed 85 percent of the state median income, (ii) the family includes at least one child who is five years of age or younger and has not yet started kindergarten, and (iii) the family meets all other income and eligibility requirements of the Program. A family described in this subdivision shall be eligible for assistance for each child in the family who is under the age of 13; and

“2. Job search activities shall be considered eligible activities for the purposes of the Program in order to maximize access to child care assistance of income-eligible families during the COVID-19 pandemic.

“§ 2. That a family determined to be eligible for assistance through the Child Care Subsidy Program pursuant to § 1 of this act shall be eligible to receive assistance for a period of 12 months or until the family’s household income exceeds 85 percent of the state median income, whichever occurs sooner.

“§ 3. That the changes to the Program described in § 1 of this act shall be administered by the Department of Social Services in partnership with the Department of Education.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 251 and 510, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Education (the Department) shall establish a two-year pilot program for the purpose of stabilizing and improving the quality of services provided in the Commonwealth’s child care industry. To the extent permitted under federal law and regulations, the pilot program shall provide a fixed sum of funds to certain child care providers that have entered into a contract with the Department or its agents or designees to provide child care services funded by the Child Care and Development Block Grant and that have agreed to meet higher standards of quality and care, as determined by the Department. The fixed amount of funds disbursed to a participating child care provider shall be determined based on (i) the number of children that the provider contracts with the Department to provide care for, subject to any attendance requirements established by the Department; (ii) the Department’s estimated comprehensive costs of providing high-quality, full-time child care services; and (iii) funds necessary to provide equitable compensation to child care staff. In determining which child care providers shall be permitted to participate in the pilot program, the Department shall prioritize providers that are located in areas of the Commonwealth that have the greatest need for child care services and serve families that are underserved and have the greatest need for child care services. The Department shall require all child care providers that participate in the pilot program to report to the Department (a) de-identified data regarding wages paid to employees of the provider and associated retention rates, (b) information that can be used to assess the financial stability of providers both before and during participation in the pilot program, and (c) any other information necessary to evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot program. The Department shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly no later than December 1 of each year of the pilot program. Such report shall include (1) the number of child care providers selected to participate in the pilot program; (2) the criteria for selection and other statistical information about child care providers selected to participate in the pilot program; (3) the locations of participating child care providers; (4) information regarding wages paid to employees of participating child care providers and associated retention rates; (5) information that can be used to assess the financial stability of participating child care providers both before and during participation in the pilot program; (6) child outcome analysis and evaluation; (7) actual expenditures for the pilot program; (8) the projected cost of and potential revenue sources for expanding the pilot program to all child care providers that have entered into a contract with the Department or its agents or designees to provide child care services funded by the Child Care and Development Block Grant; and (9) any other information deemed necessary by the Department to evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot program.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 251 and 510, cl. 5 provides: “That the Department of Education (the Department) shall, in collaboration with the School Readiness Committee, identify and analyze financing strategies that can be used to support the systemic costs of high-quality child care services, ensure equitable compensation for child care staff, and better prepare children for kindergarten. The Department shall also analyze the effectiveness of using a cost-of-quality modeling system for the child care subsidy program. The Department shall report its findings to the Governor and the General Assembly no later than December 1, 2021.”

§ 22.1-289.03.
Early childhood care and education system; establishment.

The Board shall establish a statewide unified public-private system for early childhood care and education in the Commonwealth to ensure that every child has the opportunity to enter kindergarten healthy and ready to learn. Such system shall be administered by the Board, the Superintendent, and the Department and shall be formed, implemented, and sustained through a structure that engages and leverages both state-level authority and regional-level public-private partnership assets.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the system established pursuant to subsection A shall (i) provide families with coordinated access for referral to early childhood education programs, (ii) provide families with easy-to-understand information about the quality of publicly funded early childhood care and education programs, (iii) establish expectations for the continuous improvement of early childhood care and education programs, and (iv) establish shared expectations for early childhood care and education programs among the Department of Education, the Department of Social Services, local school divisions, and state and regional stakeholders.

The system established pursuant to subsection A shall consist of a combination of programs offered through (i) the Virginia Preschool Initiative, pursuant to § 22.1-289.09, or any other school-based early childhood care and education program; (ii) licensed programs, pursuant to Article 3 (§ 22.1-289.010 et seq.); and (iii) unlicensed programs, pursuant to Article 4 (§ 22.1-289.030 et seq.).

History.

2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 4 provides: “That the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall convene a work group to develop and establish a plan for implementing a statewide unified early childhood care and education system that incorporates relevant policy-making, funding, governance, oversight, and accountability functions and culminates implementation of the quality rating and improvement system as provided in the tenth enactment of this act. The work group shall include representatives of (i) the Secretariats of Education and Health and Human Resources; (ii) relevant state agencies, including the Department of Planning and Budget, the Office of the Attorney General, the Department of Education, and the Department of Social Services; (iii) relevant regulatory boards, including the Board of Education; and (iv) the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations. Such plan shall incorporate and take into account the priorities, responsibilities, and structures needed at the state, local, and regional levels to ensure successful start-up, management, and delivery of a cohesive, aligned early childhood care and education system, as well as outline phases and a timeline for transitioning from the current state to the envisioned state of the system. Such plan shall identify necessary statutory and regulatory changes and necessary steps to transfer lead agency authority for relevant federal programs, including the Child Care and Development Block Grant and Head Start State Collaboration Office grants, to the Department of Education to align with its current administration of the Virginia Preschool Initiative and other early childhood programs. The work group shall report on the implementation plan to the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations, Education, and Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Education and Health, Finance and Appropriations, and Rehabilitation and Social Services no later than December 1, 2020, and shall provide such Chairmen an update on the implementation of the plan no later than December 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 5 provides: “That the Department of Social Services and the Department of Education shall develop a plan and enter into a cooperative agreement to ensure a coordinated and seamless transition pursuant to the provisions of this act that occurs by July 1, 2021, and that is cost effective and does not interrupt the provision of state services or have undue impact on the operation or function of either agency.”

§ 22.1-289.04.
Early childhood care and education advisory committee.

The Board shall establish an early childhood care and education advisory committee to advise the Board on programs, systems, and regulations established pursuant to this chapter. The advisory committee shall include the following members, who shall represent geographically diverse areas: (i) two representatives of publicly funded licensed providers, including at least one for-profit provider; (ii) one representative of an early childhood care and education entity that is not a publicly funded provider; (iii) two representatives of early childhood care and education entities that are license-exempt pursuant to Article 4 (§ 22.1-289.030 et seq.), including one representative of an early childhood care and education entity that is exempt from licensure pursuant to § 22.1-289.031; (iv) three representatives of Head Start providers, one of which shall be operated by a local school division, and two of which shall not be operated by a local school division; (v) two representatives from local school divisions or local school boards operating early childhood programs other than Head Start providers; (vi) two representatives of nonprofit advocacy organizations in the Commonwealth that focus on early childhood care and education; (vii) one representative of a family day home that is a publicly funded provider; (viii) two professionals or faculty members from an institution of higher education in the Commonwealth who have child development or early childhood education expertise; (ix) one representative from the Virginia chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics; (x) one representative from an advocacy or service organization that focuses on serving children with disabilities; (xi) one representative from a business in the Commonwealth; (xii) one parent of a child currently enrolled in a preschool program offered by a publicly funded provider; (xiii) one representative of the Virginia Council on Private Education; (xiv) one representative from a statewide nonprofit association in the Commonwealth whose membership includes both before-school and afterschool nonprofit child care providers and nonprofit preschool providers; (xv) one representative from a nonprofit entity that provides child care resource and referral services related to the operation of early childhood care and education programs; and (xvi) such other members as the Board may deem appropriate. The Commissioner of Social Services or his designee, the Secretary of Education or his designee, the Secretary of Health and Human Resources or his designee, the Superintendent of Public Instruction or his designee, the Commissioner of the Department of Health or his designee, the Commissioner of the Department of Behavioral Health and Development Services or his designee, and the Director of the Head Start Collaboration Office shall serve ex officio without voting privileges. The Board shall establish bylaws for such advisory committee that include term length and limits for members.

History.

2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

§ 22.1-289.05.
Uniform measurement and improvement system; regional entities; establishment.

The Board shall establish a uniform measurement and improvement system designed to provide parents and families with information about the quality and availability of publicly funded providers. Such system shall include:

Service provision and performance targets for children from birth to age five that align with standards for kindergarten readiness and early elementary grades;

Consistent quality standards;

Outcome-based measurements; and

Incentives to encourage participation and improvement.

All publicly funded providers shall be required to participate in the uniform measurement and improvement system established pursuant to subsection A. All other child day programs may participate in such system. Any participation in such system shall comply with all applicable federal laws and regulations, including the federal Head Start Act (42 U.S.C. § 9801 et seq.), as amended, and associated regulations.

The Board shall establish consequences for publicly funded providers that fail to participate in the uniform measurement and improvement system established pursuant to subsection A or persistently fail to meet minimal quality standards.

The Board shall establish a system of regional entities that will be responsible for coordinating early childhood care and education services, guiding quality improvement of such services and coordinated access to such services for families, and implementing the uniform measurement and improvement system.

History.

2020, cc. 860, 861; 2022, c. 524.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 11, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 446, cl. 2 provides: “That, notwithstanding the provisions of the third enactment of this act, the establishment and implementation of the quality rating and improvement system described in §
22.1-289.05 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall occur as follows: (i) the Board of Education shall establish such quality rating and improvement system no later than July 1, 2021, (ii) publicly funded providers may participate in the quality rating and improvement system beginning in the 2021-2022 school year and shall participate in the quality rating and improvement system beginning in the 2022-2023 school year, and (iii) the initial quality ratings shall be published in the fall of 2024.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 524, substituted “measurement” for “quality rating” in subsection A; substituted “uniform measurement” for “quality rating” in subsections B and C; and added subsection D.

§ 22.1-289.06.
Confidential records and information; penalty.

The records, information, and statistical registries of the Department and of all child day programs and family day systems concerning services to or on behalf of individuals shall be confidential information, provided that the Superintendent, the Board, and their agents or designees shall have access to such records, information, and statistical registries, and that such records, information, and statistical registries may be disclosed to any person having a legitimate interest in accordance with state and federal law and regulation.It shall be unlawful for any officer, agent, or employee of any child day program or family day system; for the Superintendent, the State Board, or their agents, designees, or employees; for any person who has held any such position; and for any other person to whom any such record or information is disclosed to disclose, directly or indirectly, any such confidential record or information, except as herein provided or pursuant to §

63.2-105

. Every violation of this section shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor.

If a request for a record or information concerning applicants for and recipients of services provided in this chapter is made to the Department by a person who does not have a legitimate interest, the Superintendent shall not provide the record or information unless permitted by state or federal law or regulation.

History.

2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

§ 22.1-289.07.
Information related to shaken baby syndrome.

The Department shall make information about shaken baby syndrome, its effects, and resources for help and support for caretakers in a printable format, and information about how to acquire information about shaken baby syndrome and its effects in an audiovisual format, available to the public on its website. Such information shall be provided to every child day program and family day system required to be licensed by the Department at the time of initial licensure and upon request.

History.

2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

§ 22.1-289.08.
Board to investigate child day programs at direction of Governor.

Whenever the Governor considers it proper or necessary to investigate the management of any child day program or family day system licensed by or required to be inspected by the Board under the provisions of this chapter, he may direct the Board, or any committee or agent thereof, to make the investigation. The Board, committee, or agent designated by the Governor shall have power to administer oaths and to summon officers, employees, or other persons to attend as witnesses and to enforce their attendance and to compel them to produce documents and give evidence.

History.

2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

§ 22.1-289.08:1.
Child Care Subsidy Program Overpayment Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Child Care Subsidy Program Overpayment Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All overpayment moneys collected or recovered by the Department or any state or local agency contracted to administer the Child Care Subsidy Program, net of any refunds due to the federal government, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund, except as prohibited by federal law or regulation. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purpose of covering the cost of providing training and supports to early childhood care and education entities. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Superintendent.

History.

2022, c. 524.